Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.037

Administrator—Adoption of standards for detention facilities for juveniles—Revision and inspection.

The administrator shall after consultation with the state planning agency established under Title II of the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974 (P.L. No. 93-415; 42 U.S.C. 5611 et seq.) following a public hearing, and after approval of the body responsible for administering the juvenile court, and no later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of chapter 291, Laws of 1977 ex. sess., adopt standards for the regulation and government of detention facilities for juveniles. Such standards may be revised from time to time, according to the procedure outlined in this section. Each detention facility shall keep a copy of such standards available for inspection at all times. Such standards shall be reviewed and the detention facilities shall be inspected annually by the administrator.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.